Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.020

Programs of public recreation.

Counties may conduct programs of public recreation, and in any such program property or facilities owned by any individual, group or organization, whether public or private, may be utilized by consent of the owner.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.68.020. Prior: 1949 c 94 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3991-15.]